Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0530.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 482g. (1) Before the circulator of a petition under section 482 has an individual sign the petition, the circulator must provide both of the following choices to the individual who is signing the petition: (a) Have the circulator indicate to the individual where the summary of the purpose of the proposed amendment or question proposed, as submitted to or as approved by the board of state canvassers, is located on the petition and give that individual the opportunity to read the summary. (b) Have the circulator read to the individual the summary of the purpose of the proposed amendment or question proposed, as submitted to or as approved by the board of state canvassers. (2) If a circulator fails to comply with the requirement under subsection (1) when obtaining a signature on a petition under section 482, the sponsor of that petition is subject to a civil fine of not more than $1,500.00, or $50.00 for each violation, whichever is greater.